Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE G. LICENSES AND OTHER REGULATION

CHAPTER 142A. SUPPORTIVE PALLIATIVE CARE SERVICES

Sec. 142A.0001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "supportive palliative care" means physician-directed interdisciplinary patient- and family-centered care provided to a patient with a serious illness without regard to the patient's age or terminal prognosis that:

(1) may be provided concurrently with methods of treatment or therapies that seek to cure or minimize the effects of the patient's illness; and

(2) seeks to optimize the quality of life for a patient with a life-threatening or life-limiting illness and the patient's family through various methods, including methods that seek to:

(A) anticipate, prevent, and treat the patient's total suffering related to the patient's physical, emotional, social, and spiritual condition;

(B) address the physical, intellectual, emotional, cultural, social, and spiritual needs of the patient; and

(C) facilitate for the patient regarding treatment options, education, informed consent, and expression of desires.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 609 (S.B. 916), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 142A.0002. REFERENCE IN OTHER LAW. Notwithstanding any other law, a reference in this code or other law to palliative care means supportive palliative care.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 609 (S.B. 916), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.